lexc/noun/enhufnevek.lexc
LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounbronz
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Casebronz;

LEXICON Casebronz
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoe2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON AddNouneej
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Caseeej;

LEXICON Caseeej
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

LEXICON AddNounszt
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Caseszt;

LEXICON Caseszt
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t

! allegro, moderato
LEXICON AddNouno
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posso;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Pluro;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famo1;

LEXICON Posso
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famo;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famo;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famo;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famo;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famo;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famo;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famo;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famo;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famo;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famo;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famo;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famo;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Geno1;

LEXICON Pluro
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Geno;
                            Geno1;
        
LEXICON Famo
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Geno;
                       Geno;
LEXICON Famo1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Geno;
                       Geno1;

LEXICON Geno
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseo;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseo;
                       Caseo;
LEXICON Geno1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseo;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseo;
                       Caseo1;
 
LEXICON Caseo
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Caseo1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
!+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! Allegro, moderato
LEXICON AddNounoo
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Caseoo;

LEXICON Caseoo
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 


!Pécsett
LEXICON AddNounott
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possott;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurott;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famott;

LEXICON Possott
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famott;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famott;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famott;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famott;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famott;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famott;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famott;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famott;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famott;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famott;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famott;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famott;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famott;

LEXICON Plurott
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genott;
                            Genott;
        
LEXICON Famott
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genott;
                       Genott;

LEXICON Genott
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseott;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseott;
                       Caseott;
LEXICON Caseott
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sue:^+cSue^§oeoe§tt         #;  ! ott, ett, ött
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

!Kolozsvárott
LEXICON AddNounottvar
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possottvar;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurottvar;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famottvar;

LEXICON Possottvar
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famottvar;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famottvar;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famottvar;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famottvar;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famottvar;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famottvar;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famottvar;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famottvar;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famottvar;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famottvar;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famottvar;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famottvar;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famottvar;

LEXICON Noun
akármely AddNouneej;
apostolvers AddNouneej;
bajazzo AddNounoo;
bajazzo:bajazzó AddNouno;
balansz AddNounszt;
betűvers AddNouneej;
bronz AddNounbronz;
békevers AddNouneej;
búvóhely AddNouneej;
capriccio AddNounoo;
capriccio:capricció AddNouno;
cinquecento AddNounoo;
cinquecento:cinquecentó AddNouno;
concertino:concertinó AddNouno;
concerto AddNounoo;
credo:credó AddNouno;
crescendo AddNounoo;
csillagvers AddNouneej;
dalvers AddNouneej;
emblémavers AddNouneej;
escudo:escudó AddNouno;
fajansz AddNounszt;
fekhely AddNouneej;
flamenco AddNounoo;
formavers AddNouneej;
fortepiano:fortepianó AddNouno;
fortissimo AddNounoo;
fűzfavers AddNouneej;
go:gó AddNouno;
grosso AddNounoo;
gyógyhely AddNouneej;
halandzsavers AddNouneej;
hiányjel AddNouneej;
homo:homó AddNouno;
hónapvers AddNouneej;
indítóvers AddNouneej;
intermezzo AddNounoo;
jégvers AddNouneej;
keresztvers AddNouneej;
kiáltványvers AddNouneej;
konferansz AddNounszt;
kultuszvers AddNouneej;
köszönővers AddNouneej;
lelőhely AddNouneej;
libris:librisz AddNouno;
limes AddNounoo;
látomásvers AddNouneej;
maestro:maestró AddNouno;
mellékvers AddNouneej;
mintavers AddNouneej;
moderato AddNounoo;
munkásvers AddNouneej;
napfényvers AddNouneej;
neoreneszánsz AddNounszt;
nonszensz AddNounszt;
numero:numeró AddNouno;
nyughely AddNouneej;
nüansz AddNounszt;
nüánsz AddNounszt;
paparazzo AddNounoo;
parasztvers AddNouneej;
pasziánsz AddNounszt;
pianissimo:pianissimó AddNouno;
piano AddNounoo;
placebo:placebó AddNouno;
poncho AddNounoo;
programvers AddNouneej;
pótfekhely AddNouneej;
quattrocento:quattrocentó AddNouno;
quo AddNounoo;
recitativo:recitativó AddNouno;
rejtvényvers AddNouneej;
reneszánsz AddNounszt;
résznyitóvers AddNouneej;
sansz AddNounszt;
scherzo AddNounoo;
semely AddNouneej;
sombrero AddNounoo;
szeánsz AddNounszt;
szituációvers AddNouneej;
tacepao:tacepaó AddNouno;
taekwondo AddNounoo;
találkozóhely AddNouneej;
transz AddNounszt;
táltosférj AddNouneej;
vendéglátóhely AddNouneej;
vízjel AddNouneej;
átkelőhely AddNouneej;
Balatonföldvár AddNounottvar;
Borzavár AddNounottvar;
Bélavár AddNounottvar;
Bérbaltavár AddNounottvar;
Csákvár AddNounottvar;
Csővár AddNounottvar;
Dombóvár AddNounottvar;
Dunaföldvár AddNounottvar;
Egervár AddNounottvar;
Fehérvár AddNounottvar;
Földvár AddNounottvar;
Gyulafehérvár AddNounottvar;
Győr AddNounott;
Győrvár AddNounottvar;
Hédervár AddNounottvar;
Ikervár AddNounottvar;
Kaposvár AddNounottvar;
Kapuvár AddNounottvar;
Kolozsvár AddNounottvar;
Kányavár AddNounottvar;
Leányvár AddNounottvar;
Lipótvár AddNounottvar;
Magyaróvár AddNounottvar;
Németújvár AddNounottvar;
Pilisvörösvár AddNounottvar;
Pécs AddNounott;
Révleányvár AddNounottvar;
Sasvár AddNounottvar;
Somogyvár AddNounottvar;
Szegvár AddNounottvar;
Szigetvár AddNounottvar;
Székesfehérvár AddNounottvar;
Ságvár AddNounottvar;
Temesvár AddNounottvar;
Törcsvár AddNounottvar;
Ungvár AddNounottvar;
Vác AddNounott;
Végvár AddNounottvar;
Vörösvár AddNounottvar;
Zalavár AddNounottvar;
Óbudavár AddNounottvar;
Újvár AddNounottvar;
Acapulco:Acapulcó AddNouno;
Antananarivo AddNounoo;
Brno:Brnó AddNouno;
Chicago AddNounoo;
Francisco:Franciscó AddNouno;
Guantánamo AddNounoo;
Lesotho:Lesothó AddNouno;
Maputo AddNounoo;
Monaco:Monacó AddNouno;
Monte-Carlo AddNounoo;
Orinoco:Orinocó AddNouno;
Oslo AddNounoo;
Paulo:Pauló AddNouno;
Quito AddNounoo;
Santiago:Santiagó AddNouno;
Seremetyjevo AddNounoo;
Toledo:Toledó AddNouno;
Torino AddNounoo;
Angelo:Angeló AddNouno;
Avogadro AddNounoo;
Bibanco:Bibancó AddNouno;
Bignio AddNounoo;
Cisco:Ciscó AddNouno;
Cupido AddNounoo;
Doletsko:Doletskó AddNouno;
Donatello AddNounoo;
Galeotto:Galeottó AddNouno;
Gedo AddNounoo;
Kvazimodo:Kvazimodó AddNouno;
Leonardo AddNounoo;
Mantuano:Mantuanó AddNouno;
Mao AddNounoo;
Nyiro:Nyiró AddNouno;
Picasso AddNounoo;
Piso:Pisó AddNouno;
Raffaello AddNounoo;
Réso:Résó AddNouno;
Sevcsenko AddNounoo;
Storno:Stornó AddNouno;
Sztehlo AddNounoo;
Tedesco:Tedescó AddNouno;
Tesco AddNounoo;
Thinsz AddNounszt;
Tognio:Tognió AddNouno;
Tubero AddNounoo;
Walko:Walkó AddNouno;
